Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1909
Costs of removal and storage; last-registered owner; liable.

The last-registered owner of an abandoned vehicle shall be liable to the local authority or state agency for the costs of removal and storage of such vehicle.

Laws 1971, LB 295, § 9;

Laws 1999, LB 90, § 10.